North Carolina, session 2025, HB363.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 160A-610 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-610. General powers of the Authority.
The general powers of the Authority shall include any or all of the following:
(1) To sue and be sued;sued.
(2) To have a seal;seal.
(3) To make rules and regulations, not inconsistent with this Chapter, for its
organization and internal management;management.
(4) To employ persons deemed necessary to carry out the functions and duties
assigned to them by the Authority and to fix their compensation, within the
limit of available funds;funds.
(5) With the approval of the unit of local government's chief administrative
official, to use officers, employees, agents and facilities of the unit of local
government for such purposes and upon such terms as may be mutually
agreeable;agreeable.
(6) To retain and employ counsel, auditors, engineers and private consultants on
an annual salary, contract basis, or otherwise for rendering professional or
technical services and advice;advice.
(7) To acquire, lease as lessee with or without option to purchase, hold, own, and
use any franchise, property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, or any
interest therein and to sell, lease as lessor with or without option to purchase,
transfer (or dispose thereof) whenever the same is no longer required for
purposes of the Authority, or exchange same for other property or rights which
are useful for the Authority's purposes, including but not necessarily limited
to parking facilities;facilities.
(7a) To enhance mobility within the region and promote sound growth patterns
through joint transit development projects as generally described by Federal
Transit Administration (FTA) policy at 62 Fed. Reg. 12266 (1997) and
implementing guidelines in FTA Circular 9300.1A, Appendix B, as the policy
and guidance may be amended; and, with respect to the planning,
*H363-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
construction, and operation of joint transit development projects, upon the
governing board's adoption of policies and procedures to ensure fair and open
competition, to select developers or development teams in substantially the
same manner as permitted by G.S. 143-129(h); and to enter into development
agreements with public, private, or nonprofit entities to undertake the
planning, construction, and operation of joint transit development projects.
(8) To acquire by gift, purchase, lease as lessee with or without option to purchase
or otherwise to construct, improve, maintain, repair, operate or administer any
component parts of a public transportation system or to contract for the
maintenance, operation or administration thereof or to lease as lessor the same
for maintenance, operation, or administration by private parties, including but
not necessarily limited to parking facilities;facilities.
(9) To make or enter into contracts, agreements, deeds, leases with or without
option to purchase, conveyances or other instruments, including contracts and
agreements with the United States, the State of North Carolina, and units of
local government;government.
(9a) To purchase or finance real or personal property in the manner provided for
cities and counties under G.S. 160A-20;G.S. 160A-20.
(10) To surrender to the State of North Carolina any property no longer required
by the Authority;Authority.
(11) To develop and make data, plans, information, surveys and studies of public
transportation facilities within the territorial jurisdiction service area of the
Authority, to prepare and make recommendations in regard thereto;thereto.
(12) To enter in a reasonable manner lands, waters or premises for the purpose of
making surveys, soundings, drillings, and examinations whereby such entry
shall not be deemed a trespass except that the Authority shall be liable for any
actual and consequential damages resulting from such entries;entries.
(13) To develop and carry out demonstration projects;projects.
(14) To make, enter into, and perform contracts with private parties, and public
transportation companies with respect to the management and operation of
public passenger transportation;transportation.
(15) To make, enter into, and perform contracts with any public utility, railroad or
transportation company for the joint use of property or rights, for the
establishment of through routes, joint fares or transfer of
passengers;passengers.
(16) To make, enter into, and perform agreements with governmental entities for
payments to the Authority for the transportation of persons for whom the
governmental entities desire transportation;transportation.
(17) With the consent of the unit of local government which would otherwise have
jurisdiction to exercise the powers enumerated in this subdivision: to issue
certificates of public convenience and necessity; and to grant franchises and
enter into franchise agreements and in all respects to regulate the operation of
buses, taxicabs and other methods of public passenger transportation which
originate and terminate within the territorial jurisdiction of the Authority as
fully as the unit of local government is now or hereafter empowered to do
within the territorial jurisdiction of the unit of local government;government.
(18) To operate public transportation systems and to enter into and perform
contracts to operate public transportation services and facilities and to own or
lease property, facilities and equipment necessary or convenient therefor, and
to rent, lease or otherwise sell the right to do so to any person, public or
private; further, to obtain grants, loans and assistance from the United States,
Page 2 House Bill 363-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the State of North Carolina, any public body, or any private source
whatsoever, but may not operate or contract for the operation of public
transportation systems outside the territorial jurisdiction of the Authority
except as provided by subdivision (20) of this section;section.
(19) To enter into and perform contracts and agreements with other public
transportation authorities, regional public transportation authorities or units of
local government pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 160A-460 through
160A-464 (Part 1 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes);
further to enter into contracts and agreements with private transportation
companies, but this subdivision does not authorize the operation of, or
contracting for the operation of, service of a public transportation system
outside the service area of the Authority;Authority.
(20) To operate public transportation systems extending service into any political
subdivision of the State of North Carolina unless a particular unit of local
government operating its own public transportation system or franchising the
operation of a public transportation system by majority vote of its governing
board, shall deny consent, but such service consent. Service provided under
this subdivision may not extend more than 10 miles outside of the territorial
jurisdiction of the authority, except that vanpool vanpool, buspool, and
carpool service shall not be subject to that mileage limitation;limitation.
(21) Except as restricted by covenants in bonds, notes, or equipment trust
certificates, to set in its sole discretion rates, fees and charges for use of its
public transportation system;system.
(22) To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its purpose and to
exercise the powers granted to the Authority;Authority.
(23) To collect or contract for the collection of taxes which it is authorized by law
to levy;levy.
(24) To issue bonds or other obligations of the Authority as provided by law and
apply the proceeds thereof to the financing of any public transportation system
or any part thereof and to refund, whether or not in advance of maturity or the
earliest redemption date, any such bonds or other obligations; andobligations.
(25) To contract for, or to provide and maintain, with respect to the facilities and
property owned, leased with or without option to purchase, operated or under
the control of the Authority, and within the territory thereof, a security force
to protect persons and property, dispense unlawful or dangerous assemblages
and assemblages which obstruct full and free passage, control pedestrian and
vehicular traffic, and otherwise preserve and protect the public peace, health,
and safety; for these purposes a member of such force shall be a peace officer
and, as such, shall have authority equivalent to the authority of a police officer
of the city or county in which said member of such force is discharging such
duties.
(26) To contract for the purchase, lease, or other acquisition of any apparatus,
supplies, materials, or equipment for public transit purposes with any person
or entity that, within the previous 60 months, after having completed a public
formal bid process substantially similar to that required by Article 8 of
Chapter 143 of the General Statutes or through the competitive proposal
method provided in G.S. 143-129(h), has contracted to furnish the apparatus,
supplies, materials, or equipment to any unit or agency approved in
G.S. 143-129(g) if the person or entity is willing to furnish the items at the
same or more favorable prices, terms, and conditions as those provided under
the contract with the other unit or agency. Any purchase made under this
House Bill 363-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
section shall be approved by the Board of Trustees as provided in
G.S. 143-129(g)."
SECTION 2. G.S. 160A-601(4) reads as rewritten:
"(4) "Public transportation" means transportation of passengers whether or not for
hire by any means of conveyance, including but not limited to a street or
elevated railway or guideway, subway, guideway; subway; motor vehicle or
motor bus, carpool bus; carpool, buspool, or vanpool, vanpool; either publicly
or privately owned and operated, holding itself out to the general public for
the transportation of persons within or working within the territorial
jurisdiction service area of the Authority, excluding charter, tour, or
sight-seeing service."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 4 House Bill 363-First Edition